Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1685.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 10 introductory paragraph of the act of August 24, 1951 (P.L.1304, No.315), known as the Local Health Administration Law, is amended to read:Section 10. Powers and Duties of County Departments of 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 Health.--[After] Except as provided in section 10.1, after it has been established, the county department of health--* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 10.1. Exception for abatement of asbestos or other similar material.--A rule, regulation, standard or penalty implemented by a county department of health regarding the abatement of asbestos or other similar material in a building or structure shall not be applicable to a municipality within the county whose governing body chooses to opt out of the rule, regulation or standard.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1685PN2070 - 2 - 123456789101112